Maine, session 132, LD683.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-A MRSA §651, sub-§2, ¶A-1, as enacted by PL 2023, c. 633, §2, is
amended to read:
A-1. An applicant shall disclose any person that holds an indirect financial interest
equal to or greater than 10% in the person for which a license or certificate of approval
is sought. For the purposes of this paragraph, "indirect financial interest" means:
(1) An option, warrant or other right to acquire an equity interest in the person for
which a license or certificate of approval is sought; or
(2) A right to payment of, or a right to payment based upon, all or any portion of
revenues, profits or losses derived from the operations under a license or certificate
of approval issued under this Title of the person for which a license or certificate
of approval is sought, including, but not limited to, profit sharing, revenue sharing
or royalty payments.
Page 1 - 132LR1389(03)